Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.13.020

Right to dissent.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5006.SL) ***

(1) A shareholder is entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment of the fair value of the shareholder's shares in the event of, any of the following corporate actions:

(a) Consummation of a merger to which the corporation is a party (i) if shareholder approval is required for the merger by RCW 23B.11A.040 or the articles of incorporation, or would be required but for the provisions of RCW 23B.11A.045, and the shareholder is, or but for the provisions of RCW 23B.11A.045 would be, entitled to vote on the merger, except that the right to dissent will not be available to any shareholder of the corporation with respect to shares of any class or series that remain outstanding after consummation of the merger; or (ii) if the corporation is a subsidiary and the merger is governed by RCW 23B.11A.050;

(b) A plan of share exchange, which has become effective, to which the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares have been acquired, if the shareholder was entitled to vote on the plan;

(c) A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition, which has become effective, of all, or substantially all, of the property and assets of the corporation other than in the usual and regular course of business, if the shareholder was entitled to vote on the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition, including a disposition in dissolution, but not including a disposition pursuant to court order or a disposition for cash pursuant to a plan by which all or substantially all of the net proceeds of the disposition will be distributed to the shareholders within one year after the date of the disposition;

(d) An amendment of the articles of incorporation, whether or not the shareholder was entitled to vote on the amendment, if the amendment effects a redemption or cancellation of all of the shareholder's shares in exchange for cash or other consideration other than shares of the corporation;

(e) Any action described in RCW 23B.25.120;

(f) Any corporate action approved pursuant to a shareholder vote to the extent the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors provides that voting or nonvoting shareholders are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their shares; or

(g) A plan of entity conversion in the case of a conversion of a domestic corporation to a foreign corporation, which has become effective, to which the domestic corporation is a party as the converting entity, if: (i) The shareholder was entitled to vote on the plan; and (ii) the shareholder does not receive shares in the surviving entity that have terms as favorable to the shareholder in all material respects and that represent at least the same percentage interest of the total voting rights of the outstanding shares of the surviving entity as the shares held by the shareholder before the conversion.

(2) A shareholder entitled to dissent and obtain payment for the shareholder's shares under this chapter may not challenge the corporate action creating the shareholder's entitlement unless the action fails to comply with the procedural requirements imposed by this title, RCW 25.10.831 through 25.10.886, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws, or is fraudulent with respect to the shareholder or the corporation.

(3) The right of a dissenting shareholder to obtain payment of the fair value of the shareholder's shares shall terminate upon the occurrence of any one of the following events:

(a) The proposed corporate action is abandoned or rescinded;

(b) A court having jurisdiction permanently enjoins or sets aside the corporate action; or

(c) The shareholder's demand for payment is withdrawn with the written consent of the corporation.

[2024 c 22 s 22; 2022 c 42 s 113; 2017 c 28 s 14; 2014 c 83 s 15; 2013 c 97 s 1. Prior: 2009 c 189 s 41; 2009 c 188 s 1404; 2003 c 35 s 9; 1991 c 269 s 37; 1989 c 165 s 141.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 188: "Sections 1401 through 1416 of this act take effect July 1, 2010." [2009 c 188 s 1417.]